Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 36
SALES TAX

Sec.

§ 63-3601. Title of act.

This act is known and may be cited as “The Idaho Sales Tax Act.”

§ 63-3602. Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the terms defined in sections 63-3603 through 63-3618, Idaho Code, shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them, except as the context or other provisions of this chapter may require.

§ 63-3603. Farming.

The terms “farm” and “farming” refer to and mean the business of operating for gain or profit a ranch or farm and include stock, dairy, poultry, fish, fur, fruit and truck farms, ranches, ranges and orchards, and custom farming.

§ 63-3604. In this state — In the state.

The terms “in this state” or “in the state” mean within the exterior limits of the state of Idaho and include all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

§ 63-3604B. Includes and including.

The terms “includes” and “including” when used in this act shall not be deemed to exclude other things otherwise within the meaning of the term defined.

§ 63-3605. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 63-3605A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 63-3605B. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 63-3605C. Logging.

The term “logging” means the harvesting of forest trees by cutting, skidding, loading, thinning or decking, regardless of whether the forest trees are owned by the person performing the harvesting when such harvesting is for resale of the product harvested.

§ 63-3605E. Marketplace facilitator.

The term “marketplace facilitator” means a person that contracts with sellers to facilitate for consideration, including the deduction of fees from a transaction, the sale of the seller’s products through a physical or electronic marketplace operated by the person, and engages:

Directly or indirectly, through one (1) or more affiliated persons, in any of the following:

Transmitting or otherwise communicating the offer or acceptance between the buyer and seller;

Owning or operating the infrastructure, electronic or physical, or the technology that brings buyers and sellers together;

Providing a virtual currency that buyers are allowed or required to use to purchase products from the seller; or

Software development or research and development activities related to any of the activities described in subsection (2) of this section, if the activities are directly related to a physical or electronic marketplace operated by the person or an affiliated person; and

In any of the following activities, with respect to the seller’s products:

Payment processing services;

Fulfillment or storage services;

Listing products for sale;

Setting prices;

Branding sales as those of the marketplace facilitator;

Taking orders;

Advertising or promotion; or

Providing customer service or accepting or assisting with returns or exchanges.

§ 63-3605H. Mining.

The term “mining” means the extraction from the earth of a mineral as defined in sections 47-701 and 47-701A, Idaho Code, excepting therefrom geothermal resources, and includes the further processing of such mineral.

§ 63-3605J. Modular building.

The term “modular building,” as defined in section 39-4301, Idaho Code, is a substantially complete building designed to be affixed to real property. The term “modular building,” includes all components incorporated in such modular building at the time of manufacture and remaining unchanged at the time of the original retail sale. Furniture, fixtures, furnishings, appliances, and attachments not incorporated as component parts of the modular building at the time of manufacture shall be subject to the sales and use tax separately and distinctly from the sales price of a modular building. Refrigerators, ranges, draperies, and wood burning stoves placed in the modular home by the manufacturer shall be deemed to be components incorporated into such modular building.

§ 63-3605L. Motor vehicle.

The term “motor vehicle” means a vehicle registered or required to be registered for use on public roads. The term “motor vehicle” does not include vehicles not required to be registered pursuant to section 49-426, Idaho Code, or intended for off-road use only, including snowmobiles, boats and aircraft, and all-terrain vehicles and off-road motorcycles when not used on public roads.

§ 63-3606. New manufactured home.

The term “new manufactured home” means a manufactured home, as defined in section 39-4105, Idaho Code, which is sold for the first time at retail. The term “new manufactured home” includes all components incorporated in such manufactured home at the time of manufacture and remaining unchanged at the time of the original retail sale thereof.

Furniture, fixtures, furnishings, appliances and attachments not incorporated as component parts of the manufactured home at the time of manufacture shall be subject to the sales and use tax separately and distinctly from the sales price of a new manufactured home. Refrigerators, ranges, draperies, and wood burning stoves placed in the manufactured home by the manufacturer shall be deemed to be components incorporated into such manufactured home.

§ 63-3606A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 63-3606B. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 63-3606C. New park model recreational vehicle.

The term “new park model recreational vehicle” means a park model recreational vehicle as defined in section 49-117, Idaho Code, that is sold for the first time at retail. The term “new park model recreational vehicle” includes all components incorporated in such park model recreational vehicle at the time of manufacture and remaining unchanged at the time of the original retail sale thereof.

Furniture, fixtures, furnishings, appliances and attachments not incorporated as component parts of the park model recreational vehicle at the time of manufacture shall be subject to the sales and use tax separately and distinctly from the sales price of the new park model recreational vehicle. Refrigerators, ranges, draperies and wood-burning stoves placed in a new park model recreational vehicle by the manufacturer shall be deemed to be components incorporated into such park model recreational vehicle.

§ 63-3607. Person.

The term “person” includes any individual, firm, copartnership, joint venture, association, social club, fraternal organization, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, trustee, syndicate, cooperative, assignee, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

§ 63-3607A. Primary or primarily.

With respect to the use of tangible personal property, “primary” or “primarily” means the predominant or greatest use of the property.

In determining the primary use of tangible personal property, all uses of the property shall be aggregated into total taxable uses and total nontaxable uses pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The primary use shall be the greater of the total taxable use or total nontaxable use.

The use of tangible personal property shall be measured in terms of hours, miles, gallons or other measure commonly or customarily used to measure or determine use of the property.

§ 63-3608. Purchase.

The term “purchase” means any transfer, rental, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, of tangible personal property for a consideration. A transaction whereby the possession of property is transferred but the seller retains the title as security for the payment of the price is a purchase. A transfer for a consideration of any publication or of tangible personal property which has been produced, fabricated, or printed to the special order of the customer is also a purchase.

§ 63-3609. Retail sale — Sale at retail.

The terms “retail sale” or “sale at retail” means a sale for any purpose other than resale in the regular course of business or lease or rental of property in the regular course of business where such rental or lease is taxable under section 63-3612(h), Idaho Code.

All persons engaged in constructing, altering, repairing or improving real estate, are consumers of the material used by them; all sales to or use by such persons of tangible personal property are taxable whether or not such persons intend resale of the improved property.

For the purpose of this chapter, the sale or purchase of personal property incidental to the sale of real property or used mobile homes is deemed a sale of real property.

§ 63-3610. Retailer.

The term “retailer” includes:

Every seller who makes any retail sale or sales of tangible personal property and every person engaged in the business of making retail sales at auction of tangible personal property owned by the person or others.

Every person engaged in the business of making sales for storage, use, or other consumption or in the business of making sales at auction of tangible personal property owned by the person or others for storage, use, or other consumption.

Every person making more than two (2) retail sales of tangible personal property during any twelve (12) month period, including sales made in the capacity of assignee for the benefit of creditors, or receiver or trustee in bankruptcy, or every person making fewer sales who holds himself out as engaging in the business of selling such tangible personal property at retail or who sells a motor vehicle.

When the state tax commission determines that it is necessary for the efficient administration of this act to regard any salesmen, representatives, peddlers, or canvassers as agents of the dealers, distributors, supervisors, or employers under whom they operate or from whom they obtain the tangible personal property sold by them, irrespective of whether they are making sales on their own behalf or on behalf of such dealers, distributors, supervisors, or employers, the state tax commission may so regard them and may regard the dealers, distributors, supervisors, or employers as retailers for the purpose of this act.

Persons conducting both contracting and retailing activities. Such persons must keep separate accounts for the retail portion of their business and pay tax in the usual fashion on this portion.

§ 63-3611. Retailer engaged in business in this state.

“Retailer engaged in business in this state” as used in this chapter means any retailer who:

Engages in recurring solicitation of purchases from residents of this state or otherwise purposefully directs its business activities at residents of this state; and

Has sufficient contact with this state, in accordance with the constitution of the United States, to allow the state to require the seller to collect and remit sales or use tax on sales of tangible personal property or services made to customers in this state.

The term “retailer engaged in business in this state” includes any of the following:

Any retailer maintaining, occupying or using, permanently or temporarily, directly or indirectly, or through a subsidiary or agent, by whatever name called, an office, place of distribution, sales or sample room or place, warehouse or storage place, or other place of business or maintaining a stock of goods.

Any retailer having any representative, agent, salesman, canvasser or solicitor operating in this state under the authority of the retailer or its subsidiary for the purpose of selling, delivering, installing or the taking of orders for any tangible personal property.

Any retailer, with respect to a lease or rental, deriving rentals from a lease or rental of tangible personal property situated in this state.

Any retailer engaging in any activity in connection with servicing or installing tangible personal property in this state.

Any retailer with substantial nexus in this state within the meaning of section 63-3615A, Idaho Code.

Any retailer having a franchisee or licensee operating under its trade name if the franchisee or licensee is required to collect the tax under the provisions of this section.

Any retailer that has an agreement, directly or indirectly, with one (1) or more persons engaged in business in this state pursuant to this section under which, for a commission or other consideration, the persons refer potential purchasers to the retailer directly, whether by a link on an internet website, written or oral presentation, or otherwise; and
(g)(i) Any retailer that has an agreement, directly or indirectly, with one (1) or more persons engaged in business in this state pursuant to this section under which, for a commission or other consideration, the persons refer potential purchasers to the retailer directly, whether by a link on an internet website, written or oral presentation, or otherwise; and

The cumulative gross receipts from sales by the retailer to purchasers who are referred by all retailers engaged in business in this state pursuant to this section with such an agreement are greater than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) during the immediately preceding twelve (12) months. For purposes of this paragraph, gross receipts means receipts from sales to customers located in this state who were referred to the retailer by persons in this state with such an agreement with the retailer.

For purposes of this paragraph, a retailer may rebut the presumption that it is soliciting sales in Idaho through persons in this state with whom it has an agreement as described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph. For purposes of administering such rebuttal, the state tax commission will deem the presumption rebutted if the retailer is able to establish that no persons as described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph engaged in any solicitation in this state on behalf of the retailer that would satisfy the nexus requirement of the United States constitution during the twelve (12) month period in question. The state tax commission may promulgate rules to administer the provisions of this subsection.

§ 63-3612. Sale.

The term “sale” means any transfer of title, exchange or barter, conditional or otherwise, of tangible personal property for a consideration and shall include any similar transfer of possession found by the state tax commission to be in lieu of, or equivalent to, a transfer of title, exchange or barter.

“Sale” shall also include the following transactions when a consideration is transferred, exchanged or bartered:

Producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting of tangible personal property for consumers who furnish, either directly or indirectly, the tangible personal property used in the producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting.

Furnishing, preparing, or serving food, meals, or drinks and nondepreciable goods and services directly consumed by customers included in the charge thereof.

A transfer of possession of property where the seller retains the title as security for the payment of the sales price.

A transfer of the title or possession of tangible personal property which has been produced, fabricated, or printed to the special order of the customer, or of any publication.

Admission to a place or for an event in Idaho, provided that an organization conducting an exempt function as defined in section 527 or exempted by section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as incorporated in section 63-3004, Idaho Code, and collecting any charges for attendance at the aforementioned event, shall not have those admission charges be defined as a sale if the event:

Is not predominately recreational or commercial; and

Any included entertainment value is minimal when compared to the charge for attendance; and

Such entity has paid sales and use tax on taxable property or services used during the event.

The use of or the privilege of using tangible personal property or facilities for recreation.

Providing hotel, motel, campground, or trailer court accommodations, nondepreciable goods directly consumed by customers and included services, except where residence is maintained continuously under the terms of a lease or similar agreement for a period in excess of thirty (30) days.

The lease or rental of tangible personal property.

The intrastate transportation for hire by air of freight or passengers, except (1) as part of a regularly scheduled flight by a certified air carrier, under authority of the United States, or (2) when providing air ambulance services.

As used in subsections (2)(b) and (2)(g) of this section, goods “directly consumed by customers” shall not be interpreted to mean any linens, bedding, cloth napkins or similar nondisposable property.

§ 63-3612A. Occasional sale. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3613. Sales price.

The term “sales price” means the total amount for which tangible personal property, including services agreed to be rendered as a part of the sale, is sold, rented or leased, valued in money, whether paid in money or otherwise, without any deduction on account of any of the following:

The cost of the property sold. However, in accordance with such rules as the state tax commission may prescribe, a deduction may be taken if the retailer has purchased property for some purpose other than resale or rental, has reimbursed his vendor for tax which the vendor is required to pay to the state or has paid the use tax with respect to the property, and has resold or rented the property prior to making any use of the property other than retention, demonstration or display while holding it for sale in the regular course of business. If such a deduction is taken by the retailer, no refund or credit will be allowed to his vendor with respect to the sale of the property.

The cost of materials used, labor or service cost, losses, or any other expense.

The cost of transportation of the property prior to its sale.

The face value of manufacturer’s discount coupons. A manufacturer’s discount coupon is a price reduction coupon presented by a consumer to a retailer upon purchase of a manufacturer’s product, the face value of which may only be reimbursed by the manufacturer to the retailer.

The term “sales price” does not include any of the following:

Retailer discounts allowed and taken on sales, but only to the extent that such retailer discounts represent price adjustments as opposed to cash discounts offered only as an inducement for prompt payment.

Any sums allowed on merchandise accepted in payment of other merchandise, provided that this allowance shall not apply to the sale of a “new manufactured home,” a “new park model recreational vehicle” or a “modular building” as defined herein.

The amount charged for property returned by customers when the amount charged therefor is refunded either in cash or credit; but this exclusion shall not apply in any instance when the customer, in order to obtain the refund, is required to purchase other property at a price greater than the amount charged for the property that is returned.

The amount charged for labor or services rendered in installing or applying the property sold, provided that said amount is stated separately and such separate statement is not used as a means of avoiding imposition of this tax upon the actual sales price of the tangible personal property; except that charges by a manufactured homes dealer or park model recreational vehicle dealer for set up of a manufactured home or park model recreational vehicle shall be included in the “sales price” of such manufactured home or park model recreational vehicle.

The amount of any tax (not including, however, any manufacturers’ or importers’ excise tax) imposed by the United States upon or with respect to retail sales whether imposed upon the retailer or the consumer.

The amount charged for finance charges, carrying charges, service charges, time-price differential, or interest on deferred payment sales, provided such charges are not used as a means of avoiding imposition of this tax upon the actual sales price of the tangible personal property.
7. Delivery and handling charges for transportation of tangible personal property to the consumer, provided that the transportation is stated separately and the separate statement is not used as a means of avoiding imposition of the tax upon the actual sales price of the tangible personal property; except that charges by a manufactured homes dealer or park model recreational vehicle dealer for transportation of a manufactured home or park model recreational vehicle shall be included in the “sales price” of such manufactured home or park model recreational vehicle.

The sales price of a “new manufactured home” or a “modular building” as defined in this chapter shall be limited to and include only fifty-five percent (55%) of the sales price as otherwise defined herein.

Taxes previously paid on amounts represented by accounts found to be worthless may be credited upon a subsequent payment of the tax provided in this chapter or, if no such tax is due, refunded. If such accounts are thereafter collected, a tax shall be paid upon the amount so collected.

Tangible personal property when sold at retail for more than eleven cents (11¢) but less than one dollar and one cent ($1.01) through a vending machine shall be deemed to have sold at a sales price equal to one hundred seventeen percent (117%) of the price which is paid for such tangible personal property and/or its component parts including packaging by the owner or operator of the vending machines.

Sales price shall not include a gratuity or tip received when paid to the service provider of a meal. The gratuity or tip can be either voluntary or mandatory, but must be given for the service provided and as a supplement to the service provider’s income.

The sales price of a “new park model recreational vehicle” shall include one hundred percent (100%) of the sales price as otherwise defined in this section.

8. Manufacturers’ rebates when used at the time of a retail sale as a down payment on or reduction to the retail sales price of a motor vehicle to which the rebate applies. A manufacturer’s rebate is a cash payment made by a manufacturer to a consumer who has purchased or is purchasing the manufacturer’s product from the retailer.

9. The amount of any fee imposed upon an outfitter as defined in section 36-2102, Idaho Code, by a governmental entity pursuant to statute for the purpose of conducting outfitting activities on land or water subject to the jurisdiction of the governmental entity, provided that the fee is stated separately and is presented as a use fee paid by the outfitted public to be passed through to the governmental entity.

10. The amount of any discount or other price reduction on telecommunications equipment when offered as an inducement to the consumer to commence or continue telecommunications service, or the amount of any commission or other indirect compensation received by a retailer or seller as a result of the consumer commencing or continuing telecommunications service.

§ 63-3614. Seller.

The term “seller” means every person making sales at retail or retail sales to a buyer or consumer, whether as agent, broker or principal.

§ 63-3615. Storage — Use.

The term “storage” includes any keeping or retention in this state for any purpose except sale in the regular course of business or subsequent use solely outside this state of tangible personal property purchased from a retailer.

The term “use” includes the exercise of any right or power over tangible personal property incident to the ownership or the leasing of that property or the exercise of any right or power over tangible personal property by any person in the performance of a contract, or to fulfill contract or subcontract obligations, whether the title of such property be in the subcontractor, contractor, contractee, subcontractee, or any other person, or whether the titleholder of such property would be subject to the sales or use tax, unless such property would be exempt to the titleholder under section 63-3622D, Idaho Code, except that the term “use” does not include the sale of that property in the regular course of business.

“Storage” and “use” do not include the keeping, retaining, or exercising of any right or power over tangible personal property for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside the state for use thereafter solely outside the state, or for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible personal property to be transported outside the state, and thereafter used solely outside the state.

§ 63-3615A. Substantial nexus.

Subject to the limitation in subsection (2) of section 63-3611, Idaho Code, a retailer has substantial nexus with this state if both of the following apply:

The retailer and an in-state business maintaining one (1) or more locations within this state are related parties; and

The retailer and the in-state business use an identical or substantially similar name, trade name, trademark or goodwill to develop, promote or maintain sales, or the in-state business provides services to, or that inure to the benefit of, the out-of-state business related to developing, promoting or maintaining the in-state market.

Two (2) entities are related parties under this section if they meet any one (1) of the following tests:

Both entities are component members of the same controlled group of corporations under section 1563 of the Internal Revenue Code;

One (1) entity is a related taxpayer to the other entity under the provisions of section 267 of the Internal Revenue Code;

One (1) entity is a corporation and the other entity and any party, for which section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code requires an attribution of ownership of stock from that party to the entity, own directly, indirectly, beneficially, or constructively at least fifty percent (50%) of the value of the outstanding stock of the corporation; or

One (1) or both entities is a limited liability company, partnership, estate or trust, none of which is treated as a corporation for federal income tax purposes, and such limited liability company, partnership, estate or trust and its members, partners or beneficiaries own in the aggregate directly, indirectly, beneficially, or constructively at least fifty percent (50%) of the profits, capital, stock or value of the other entity or both entities.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a retailer that had sales in this state in the previous year in an amount of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

The definition of “Internal Revenue Code” in section 63-3004, Idaho Code, shall apply to this section.

§ 63-3616. Tangible personal property.

The term “tangible personal property” means personal property which may be seen, weighed, measured, felt or touched, or which is in any other manner perceptible to the senses.

The term “tangible personal property” includes any computer software except the following: custom computer programs; computer software that is delivered electronically; remotely accessed computer software; and computer software that is delivered by the load and leave method where the vendor or its agent loads the software at the user’s location but does not transfer any tangible personal property containing the software to the user. As used in this subsection, the term “remotely accessed computer software” means computer software that a user accesses over the internet, over private or public networks, or through wireless media, where the user has only the right to use or access the software by means of a license, lease, subscription, service or other agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing exclusions of certain types of computer software from the definition of tangible personal property, tangible personal property shall include computer software that constitutes digital music, digital books, digital videos and digital games when the purchaser has a permanent right to use such software and, regardless of the method of delivery or access. If the right to use digital music, digital books, digital videos or digital games is conditioned upon continued payment from the purchaser it is not a permanent right of use.

As used in this subsection, the term “computer software” means any computer program, part of a program or any sequence of instructions for automatic data processing equipment or information stored in an electronic medium.

As used in this subsection, the term “custom computer program” means any computer software, as defined in this subsection, which is written or prepared exclusively for a customer and includes those services represented by separately stated charges for the modification of existing prewritten programs when the modifications are written or prepared exclusively for a customer. The term does not include a “canned” or prewritten program which is held or existing for general or repeated sale, lease or license, even if the program was initially developed on a custom basis or for in-house use. Modification to an existing prewritten program to meet the customer’s needs is custom computer programming only to the extent of the modification, and only to the extent that the actual amount charged for the modification is separately stated on invoices, statements, and other billing documents supplied to the purchaser.

The term “tangible personal property” does not include advertising space when sold to an advertiser or its agent by the publisher of the newspaper or the magazine in which the advertisement is displayed or circulated.

§ 63-3617. Tax collector. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3618. Taxpayer.

The term “taxpayer” means any person subject to or liable for any taxes imposed by this act.

§ 63-3619. Imposition and rate of the sales tax.

An excise tax is hereby imposed upon each sale at retail at the rate of six percent (6%) of the sales price of all retail sales subject to taxation under this chapter and such amount shall be computed monthly on all sales at retail within the preceding month.

The tax shall apply to, be computed on, and collected for all credit, installment, conditional or similar sales at the time of the sale or, in the case of rentals, at the time the rental is charged.

The tax hereby imposed shall be collected by the retailer from the consumer.

The state tax commission shall provide schedules for collection of the tax on sales which involve a fraction of a dollar. The retailer shall calculate the tax upon the entire amount of the purchases of the consumer made at a particular time and not separately upon each item purchased. The retailer may retain any amount collected under the bracket system prescribed which is in excess of the amount of tax for which he is liable to the state during the period as compensation for the work of collecting the tax.

It is unlawful for any retailer to advertise or hold out or state to the public or to any customer, directly or indirectly, that the tax or any part thereof will be assumed or absorbed by the retailer or that it will not be added to the selling price of the property sold or that if added it or any part thereof will be refunded. Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The tax commission may by rule provide that the amount collected by the retailer from the customer in reimbursement of the tax be displayed separately from the list price, the price advertised on the premises, the marked price, or other price on the sales slip or other proof of sale.

The taxes imposed by this chapter shall apply to the sales to contractors purchasing for use in the performance of contracts with the United States.

§ 63-3620. Permits — Issuance — Revocation — Penalties.

Every retailer engaged in business in this state, before conducting business within this state, shall file with the state tax commission an application for a seller’s permit. Every application for a permit shall be made upon a form prescribed by the state tax commission and shall set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or intends to transact business, the location of his place or places of business, and such other information as the state tax commission may require. The applications, or any information contained thereon, may be made available by the tax commission to authorized representatives of state or federal agencies. The application shall be signed by the owner if he is a natural person or by an individual authorized by the seller to sign the application. Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, permits shall be issued without charge.

The state tax commission, for the efficient administration of this chapter, may issue:

Temporary seller’s permits. No retailer shall be issued more than three (3) temporary permits in one (1) calendar year. A temporary permit shall be valid only for the period of time shown on the face thereof.

Wholesaler’s permits to persons who are not retailers but who purchase tangible personal property for resale. A wholesaler’s permit shall be valid for no more than twelve (12) consecutive months and may be renewed by the commission.

The person signing the application shall certify that the applicant will actively engage in or conduct a business making sales subject to tax under this chapter.

After compliance by the applicant with the requirements set out above and in section 63-3625, Idaho Code, the state tax commission shall grant and issue to each applicant a permit. A permit shall not be assignable, and shall be valid only for the person in whose name it is issued. The permit or a copy thereof shall at all times be conspicuously displayed at each place where the person to whom it is issued conducts business.

A seller whose permit has been previously suspended or revoked shall pay the state tax commission a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for the renewal or issuance of a permit in the event of a first revocation and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for renewal after each successive revocation unless the suspension or revocation is for inactivity pursuant to section 63-3620A, Idaho Code.

Whenever any person fails to comply with any provision of this chapter relating to the sales tax or any rules of the state tax commission relating to the sales tax prescribed and adopted under this chapter, the state tax commission may revoke or suspend any one (1) or more of the permits held by the person or may deny a new permit to such person. Notice of revocation or denial shall be given in the manner provided for deficiencies in taxes in section 63-3629, Idaho Code, which shall be subject to review as provided in section 63-3631, Idaho Code. The state tax commission shall not issue a new permit after the revocation of a permit unless the commission is satisfied that the former holder of the permit will comply with the provisions of this chapter relating to the sales tax and the rules of the state tax commission.

§ 63-3620A. Revocation, suspension or expiration of permits held by persons not actively engaged in business.

A permit shall be held only by persons actively engaged in making sales subject to tax under this chapter. Any person not so engaged shall forthwith surrender his permit to the state tax commission for cancellation. The state tax commission may revoke the permit of a person not actively engaged in making sales subject to tax under this chapter.

Notice of revocation shall be given in the manner provided for deficiencies in taxes in section 63-3629, Idaho Code, which shall be subject to review as provided in section 63-3631, Idaho Code.

A permit held by a person who, for a period of twelve (12) consecutive months, reports no sales shall expire automatically upon the state tax commission providing notice of the expiration to the last known address of the person to whom the permit was issued.

The state tax commission may provide by rule for the temporary suspension of permits held by persons engaged in seasonal business or who may otherwise temporarily not be actively engaged in the business of making sales subject to tax under this chapter.

§ 63-3620B. Agreements to collect and remit sales tax.

The state tax commission may enter into agreements with persons who may not be otherwise liable to collect and remit sales or use taxes for the collection of sales and use taxes due on their sales of tangible personal property or taxable services to customers in this state. These agreements shall be made on terms and conditions determined by the commission to be in the best interests of the state.

The state tax commission is authorized to participate in the northwest regional sales tax pilot project with states, especially the states of Washington and Utah, and selected businesses, to simplify the sales and use tax administration and to enter into joint agreements for that purpose.

Agreements to participate in the pilot project shall establish provisions for the administration, imposition and collection of sales and use taxes resulting in revenues paid that are substantially the same as would be paid under this chapter.

Business parties to the agreements are excused from complying with the provisions of this chapter to the extent a different procedure is required by the agreements.

Agreements authorized in subsection (2) of this section shall terminate on June 30, 2001.